Maine, session 132, LD1481.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §6281, first ¶, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. S, §10, is
amended to read:
This chapter applies only to the property tax year beginning April 1, 2023 and to
property tax years beginning on or after April 1, 2025.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §6281, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 441, Pt. D, §1,
is further amended to read:
B. "Eligible individual" means an individual who, on April 1 1st of the property tax
year for which the individual is requesting stabilization:
(1) Is 65 years of age or older; and
(2) Is a permanent resident of the State as defined in section 681, subsection 4 and
has owned a homestead in the State for at least 10 20 years.; and
(3) Has federal adjusted gross income not exceeding $75,000.
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §6281, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 751, §1, is amended to
read:
2. Application for stabilization; continuation. An individual may apply by
December 1st to the municipality in which the individual's homestead is located requesting
that the municipality stabilize the property tax assessed on that individual's homestead for
the property tax year beginning on April 1st following the submission of the application.
A new application is required for each year for which stabilization is requested. If an
individual whose property tax is stabilized for a homestead pursuant to this chapter wants
the stabilization to continue, that individual shall file, for each subsequent property tax year
for which a continuation is desired, a request, in writing, indicating that the homestead is
still an eligible homestead.
Sec. 4. 36 MRSA §6281, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 751, §1, is amended to
read:
4. Transfer of eligibility. If an eligible individual has been eligible for stabilization
under this section and establishes a new homestead in the State, the individual continues to
be eligible for stabilization. If an eligible individual establishes a new homestead in a
different municipality, at the request of the eligible individual, the municipality where
eligibility was first established shall notify the new municipality of the eligible individual's
previous eligibility and the amount at which the property taxes were stabilized. The the
new municipality shall bill the eligible individual at the stabilized amount stabilize the
property tax assessed on that individual's homestead for the property tax year beginning on
April 1st following the establishment of the new homestead, and the new municipality is
eligible for state compensation under subsection 5.
Sec. 5. Application. This Act applies to property tax years beginning on or after
April 1, 2025.